Washington statutes.
RCW 43.300.040

Director's duties.

In addition to other powers and duties granted or transferred to the director, the commission may delegate to the director any of the powers and duties vested in the commission.

[ 1996 c 267 s 33; 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 5.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—1996 c 267: See notes following RCW 77.12.177.